Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-1339
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the K-12 Education Cybersecurity Act:

(1) Commission means the Nebraska Information Technology Commission;

(2) Consortium means a group of schools joined together for purposes of receiving funding pursuant to the K-12 Education Cybersecurity Act for use in purchasing and providing cybersecurity products and services for such schools that is facilitated by an educational service unit;

(3) Coordinating council means the Educational Service Unit Coordinating Council;

(4) Coordinating council director means the council director of the Educational Service Unit Coordinating Council;

(5) Cybersecurity framework means a structured set of guidelines or standards that are used by a governing board to identify, assess, and manage such governing board's readiness for cybersecurity threats;

(6) Department means the State Department of Education;

(7) Governing board means the school board of a school district, the governing board of a private, denominational, or parochial school, or the board of directors of an educational service unit;

(8) Implementation coordinator means the individual assigned by the coordinating council to assist educational service units in local implementation of cybersecurity measures;

(9) Office means the office of Chief Information Officer; and

(10) School means a school district or an approved or accredited private, denominational, or parochial school offering instruction in elementary or high school grades.

Laws 2026, LB937, § 27.
July 18, 2026